Utah statutes.
53A-15-1005.   Services to students with disabilities.

Students with disabilities who may need additional services or resources and who seek to enroll in Electronic High School classes may request appropriate accommodations through the students' assigned schools or school districts.



Enacted by Chapter 227, 2006 General Session

